Massachusetts, session 194th, S1686.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 129B of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by deleting the following in lines 341 through 342:- “Failure
to so notify shall be cause for revocation or suspension of such card.”
SECTION 2. Section 131 of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by deleting the following in lines 350 through 352:- “Failure to so notify shall be cause
for revocation or suspension of said license.”
of 1